Connecticut, session 2026, SB00262.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 3-95 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 The fee for any act performed by a notary public in accordance with
4 the provisions of the general statutes shall not exceed [five] ten dollars
5 plus an additional thirty-five cents for each mile of travel.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 3-95